District of Columbia statutes.
25-822

Mandatory revocation.

The Board shall revoke the license of a licensee as a result of any of the following events during the period for which the license was issued:

(1)

The licensee has been convicted of multiple violations of the terms of this title or the regulations issued under this title and the penalties set forth in Chapter 8 or established by the Board require revocation;

(2)

The licensee has knowingly permitted, in the licensed establishment (A) the illegal sale, or negotiations for sale, or the use, of any controlled substance identified in the CSA, or (B) the possession or sale, or negotiations for sale, of drug paraphernalia in violation of the CSA or Chapter 11 of Title 48. Successive sales, or negotiations for sale, over a continuous period of time shall be deemed evidence of knowing permission; or

(3)

The licensee has been convicted of a felony.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 17
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 9
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 803, ch. 766, § 3
Apr. 26, 1950, 64 Stat. 88, ch. 106
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(a)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 9, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(5), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 11, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(b), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-97, § 2, 45 DCR 1517
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-822.
1973 Ed., § 25-118.